Maryland, session 2026, HB0230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
2–103.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Capital project” means:
(i) Any project for which funds are expended for construction,
reconstruction, or rehabilitation of a transportation facility by the Department or of a
transportation facilities project by the Maryland Transportation Authority; or
(ii) Capital equipment, as defined by the Secretary.
(3) “Construction phase” means the phase of a capital project in which the
project is committed and advanced from the project development phase to completion.
(4) “FINAL PROJECT DEVELOPMENT PHASE” MEANS THE PHASE OF A
CAPITAL PROJECT IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS ADVANCED FROM PRELIMINARY
ENGINEERING THROUGH FINAL DESIGN ACTIVITIES.
(5) “INITIAL PROJECT DEVELOPMENT PHASE” MEANS THE PHASE OF
A CAPITAL PROJECT IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS ADVANCED FROM EARLY PLANNING
AND FEASIBILITY ANALYSIS TO A LEVEL OF PRELIMINARY ENGINEERING.
[(4)] (6) “Major capital project” means any new, expanded, or
significantly improved facility or service that involves planning, environmental studies,
design, right–of–way, construction, or purchase of essential equipment related to the
facility or service.
[(5)] (7) “Major SURFACE transportation project” has the meaning stated
in § 2–103.7 of this subtitle.
[(6)] (8) “Minor capital project” means any project for the preservation or
rehabilitation of an existing facility or service, including the planning, design,
right–of–way, construction, or purchase of equipment essential to the facility or service,
and generally not requiring the preparation of an environmental impact assessment.
[(7)] (9) (I) “Project development phase” means the phase of a capital
project in which planning, engineering, and environmental studies and analyses are
conducted with full participation by the public, prior to [commitment to] construction.

HOUSE BILL 230 3
(II) “PROJECT DEVELOPMENT PHASE” INCLUDES THE INITIAL
PROJECT DEVELOPMENT PHASE OR FINAL PROJECT DEVELOPMENT PHASE.
[(8)] (10) (i) “Proposing entity” means a government agency or political
subdivision that requests that a transportation project be included in the Consolidated
Transportation Program.
(ii) “Proposing entity” includes a county, a municipality, a
metropolitan planning organization, A TRANSIT AGENCY, and a modal administration or
any other agency of the Department.
[(9)] (11) “Purpose and need summary statement” means a brief statement
that specifies the underlying purpose and need for a project.
[(10)] (12) “Significant change” means any change that affects the size or
character of a project to the extent that the change:
(i) Substantially modifies the capacity, level of service, or cost of the
project;
(ii) Alters the function or purpose of the project; or
(iii) Impacts the ability of a modal administration to accomplish the
program priorities established by the Secretary in the State Report on Transportation.
[(11)] (13) “State transportation goals” means the goals described in §
2–103.7 of this subtitle.
(14) “TRANSIT AGENCY” MEANS THE MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION OR AN AGENCY THAT OPERATES A LOCALLY OPERATED TRANSIT
SYSTEM.
[(12)] (15) “Transportation facilities project” has the meaning stated in [§
4–101(i)] § 4–101 of this article.
[(13)] (16) “Transportation facility” has the meaning stated in § 3–101(l) of
this article.
(c) (1) The Consolidated Transportation Program shall:
(i) Be revised annually; and
(ii) Include:
1. A list of:

HOUSE BILL 230
A. The State transportation goals;
B. Program priorities;
C. For projects in the [construction] PROJECT
DEVELOPMENT phase, the criteria used to select DIFFERENT TYPES OF major capital
projects for inclusion in the capital program; and
D. The [manner in which each major transportation project
was evaluated and ranked] RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION OF MAJOR SURFACE
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS SELECTED FOR FUNDING under § 2–103.7 of this
subtitle;
2. A statement of the Department’s projected annual
operating costs, set forth separately for the Office of the Secretary and for each modal
administration;
3. Expanded descriptions of major capital projects;
4. A list of major capital projects for the current year, the
budget request year, and the 4 successive planning years;
5. A list of [anticipated] ALL IDENTIFIED minor capital
projects[, including a specific list of anticipated special projects] for the current year and
the budget request year and an estimate of the Program level for each of the 4 successive
planning years;
6. A list of major bridge work projects;
7. A summary of the capital and operating programs, as
defined by the Secretary, for the Maryland Transportation Authority;
8. For each listed major capital project, an indication
whether the revenue source anticipated to support that project consists of federal, special,
general, or other funds;
9. The Department’s estimates of the levels and sources of
revenues to be used to fund the projects in the Program;
10. A glossary of terms; and
11. A cross–reference table for the information contained in
the various parts of the State Report on Transportation.
(2) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Consolidated Transportation Program shall include:

HOUSE BILL 230 5
(i) A summary of current efforts and future plans, prepared after
consultation with the Director of Bicycle and Pedestrian Access and the Bicycle and
Pedestrian Advisory Committee established under § 2–606 of this title:
1. To develop and promote bicycle and pedestrian
transportation; and
2. Working together with local jurisdictions, to accommodate
in a safe and effective manner pedestrians and bicycles within a reasonable distance for
walking and bicycling to rail stops, light rail stops, and subway stations;
(ii) A listing of all bicycle and pedestrian transportation projects
expected to use State or federal highway funds; and
(iii) Reflected under the Office of the Secretary, any
technology–related project to be funded from the account established under § 2–111 of this
subtitle, along with a description and projected cost of each.
(3) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Consolidated Transportation Program shall include a summary of current efforts and
future plans to increase commuter access between the campuses of the University of
Maryland, including:
(i) Easing traffic congestion; and
(ii) Use of mass transit.
(4) Annually, the Consolidated Transportation Program shall include a
report that:
(i) Identifies each major capital project for which the budget bill or
a supplemental budget amendment first requests funds for the project development phase
or for the construction phase;
(ii) With respect to each major capital project for which funds are
requested in the budget request year, states:
1. The amount of the funds requested; and
2. The total estimated cost of the project;
(iii) Identifies significant changes in the cost, scope, design, or
scheduling of major capital projects for each completed fiscal year;
(iv) When there is a significant change in cost, states the amount by
which the expenditures that have been authorized exceed the original project estimate;

HOUSE BILL 230
(v) When there is a significant change, states:
1. The amount by which costs exceed projected costs during
each completed fiscal year; and
2. The total amount that has been expended for a major
capital project;
(vi) Provides a purpose and need summary statement that includes:
1. A general description and summary that describes why
the project is necessary and satisfies State transportation goals, including Climate Action
Plan goals required by the Greenhouse Gas Emissions Reduction Act of 2009 under §
2–1205(b) of the Environment Article;
2. The location of the project, including a map of the project
limits, project area, or transportation corridor; and
3. A summary of how the project meets the selection criteria
for inclusion in the capital program;
(vii) Provides the Maryland Transit Administration state of good
repair budget for the current fiscal year and projections for the subsequent fiscal year; and
(viii) Includes any other information that the Secretary believes would
be useful to the members of the General Assembly, the general public, or other recipients
of the Consolidated Transportation Program.
(5) The total operating and capital expenditures for the Department or for
the Office of the Secretary or any modal administration projected in the Consolidated
Transportation Program for the budget request year may not exceed the budget request for
the Department, Office, or modal administration for that year.
[(6) For a major capital project to be considered for inclusion in the
construction program of the Consolidated Transportation Program, a request must be
submitted to the Secretary by the proposing entity along with a purpose and need summary
statement justifying the project that includes:
(i) The location of the project, including a map of the project limits,
project area, or transportation corridor;
(ii) The need for the project;
(iii) A discussion of how the project:
1. Addresses State transportation goals; and

HOUSE BILL 230 7
2. Supports local government land use plans and goals; and
(iv) A certification that all members of the legislative delegation of
the county in which the project is located have been notified.
(7) (i) The Department shall evaluate requests for major capital
projects based on the State’s transportation goals and, if applicable, using the measures
established under § 2–103.7 of this subtitle, and, as appropriate, criteria as determined by
the information submitted by the proposing entity and the availability of funding.
(ii) As part of the evaluation under this paragraph, the Department
shall acknowledge the difference between urban and rural transportation needs.]
(6) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER REQUESTS FOR
PROJECTS FOR FUNDING IN THE DEVELOPMENT AND EVALUATION PROGRAM,
STATE OF GOOD REPAIR PROGRAMS, AND THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING PROGRAM.
(II) AS PART OF ITS CONSIDERATION OF PROJECTS REQUESTED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. ESTABLISH AND PUBLISH CLEAR GUIDELINES FOR A
PROPOSING ENTITY TO MAKE A REQUEST FOR EACH PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE
FORM OF PRIORITY LETTERS, PROCESSES, AND CRITERIA THAT THE DEPARTMENT
WILL USE TO EVALUATE EACH REQUEST;
2. ESTABLISH A WEB–BASED SYSTEM FOR SUBMISSION
OF PROJECTS TO BE CONSIDERED FOR INCLUSION IN THE CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM; AND
3. PROVIDE RESPONSES EVERY OTHER YEAR TO EACH
REQUEST RECEIVED FOR THE PRIORITIZATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.7 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, INCLUDING INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE DEPARTMENT’S
EVALUATION OF THE REQUESTED PROJECT.
[(8)] (7) (i) The Department, in developing a construction or
improvement project involving a bridge or other transportation facility that is adjacent to
or crosses a waterway for inclusion in the Consolidated Transportation Program, shall
consider any reasonable and appropriate measures to provide or improve in the vicinity of
the bridge or other transportation facility water access for fishing, canoeing, kayaking, or
any other nonmotorized water dependent recreational activity.
(ii) The Department, in consultation with the Department of
Natural Resources and interested stakeholders, shall establish:

HOUSE BILL 230
1. Standards and guidelines for identifying appropriate
bridges and other transportation facilities to be considered for the provision or
improvement of water access under this paragraph; and
2. Best practices and cost effective strategies for
accommodating water access under this paragraph.
[(9)] (8) Except as authorized by law, the Consolidated Transportation
Program may not include capital transportation grants for roads and highways to counties
or municipal corporations for any period beyond the budget request year.
[(10)] (9) (i) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Consolidated Transportation Program shall include:
1. A table that identifies each project receiving construction
funds:
A. For the first time in the budget request year; and
B. For the first time in the current year if the construction
funds were not identified in the budget year in the Consolidated Transportation Program
released the previous January; and
2. A table that identifies each project receiving planning
funds:
A. For the first time in the budget request year; and
B. For the first time in the current year if the planning funds
were not shown in the budget request year in the Consolidated Transportation Program
released the previous January.
(ii) For each project included in a table required under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, the table shall identify:
1. Where the project is listed in the Consolidated
Transportation Program; and
2. By fund, the amount included in the current year budget
and the budget request year budget for the project.
(e) On or before November [15] 30 of each year, the Department shall visit each
county to give local governments and local legislative delegations information about and an
opportunity to comment on the [proposed Consolidated Transportation Program and the
proposed Maryland Transportation Plan] FOLLOWING:

HOUSE BILL 230 9
(1) THE PROPOSED CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM;
(2) TRANSPORTATION PERFORMANCE AND THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION PLAN IN PLAN DEVELOPMENT YEARS;
(3) IN EVEN–NUMBERED FISCAL YEARS, THE RESULTS OF THE
PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM DESCRIBED IN § 2–103.7 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) IN ODD–NUMBERED FISCAL YEARS:
(I) METHODOLOGY AND PROGRAM COMMENTS RELATED TO
THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM; AND
(II) LOCAL PRIORITIES FOR TRANSPORTATION STATE OF GOOD
REPAIR, ASSET MANAGEMENT, AND INITIAL PROJECT DEVELOPMENT.
(m) (1) (i) Subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article:
1. On or before [September 1] OCTOBER 1 of each year, the
Department shall submit copies of the proposed Consolidated Transportation Program and
the supporting financial forecast to the General Assembly; and
2–103.7.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “LOCALLY MANAGED CAPITAL PROJECT” MEANS:
(I) A CAPITAL PROJECT PERFORMED BY A POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION IN A RIGHT–OF–WAY THAT IS CONTROLLED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION, OR A PASSENGER
OR FREIGHT RAILROAD; OR
(II) IN THE CASE OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION WITHOUT ANY
RIGHTS–OF–WAY CONTROLLED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, A
CAPITAL PROJECT PERFORMED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION IN A RIGHT–OF–WAY
CONTROLLED BY THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, THE MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION, OR A PASSENGER OR FREIGHT RAILROAD.
(3) “Major capital project” has the meaning stated in § 2–103.1 of this
subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 230
[(3)] (4) (i) “Major SURFACE transportation project” means a major
capital project THAT IS in the State Highway Administration or the Maryland Transit
Administration [whose] OR THAT IS A LOCALLY MANAGED CAPITAL PROJECT:
1. WHOSE total cost for all phases exceeds $5,000,000 [and
that:
1. Increases highway or transit capacity;
2. Reduces areas of heavy traffic congestion;
3. Improves commute times in areas of heavy traffic
congestion;
4. Improves transit stations or station areas; or
5. Improves highway capacity through the use of intelligent
transportation systems or congestion management systems];
2. THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY OR ABILITY OF THE
HIGHWAY, TRANSIT, OR RAIL SYSTEM TO MOVE PEOPLE AND GOODS; AND
3. WHOSE TOTAL COST ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
INCREASED CAPACITY EXCEEDS $5,000,000.
(ii) “Major SURFACE transportation project” does not include:
1. Projects in the Maryland Aviation Administration, the
Maryland Port Administration, [or] THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, THE
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY, the Maryland Transportation Authority, OR THE
WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY;
2. Maintenance and storage facilities projects;
3. Water quality improvement projects;
4. Projects related to Maryland’s priorities for total
maximum daily load development;
5. Safety–related projects that [do not increase highway or
transit capacity] RECEIVE FUNDING UNDER 23 U.S.C. § 148 OR THAT DO NOT
SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASE TRANSIT CAPACITY;

HOUSE BILL 230 11
6. [Roads within] PROJECTS FUNDED, APPROPRIATED,
OR APPORTIONED UNDER the Appalachian Development Highway System PROGRAM;
[or]
7. Projects that are solely for system preservation OR STATE
OF GOOD REPAIR PURPOSES;
8. PROJECTS WHERE BICYCLE OR PEDESTRIAN
ELEMENTS ARE ADDED AS A RESULT OF THE DEPARTMENT’S COMPLETE STREETS
POLICY; OR
9. PROJECTS FUNDED WITH FEDERAL SOURCES EXEMPT
FROM THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING PROCESS DUE TO EXISTING EVALUATION
PROCESSES, INCLUDING:
A. CONGESTION MITIGATION AIR QUALITY FUNDS;
B. TRANSPORTATION ALTERNATIVES FUNDS;
C. PROTECT PROGRAM FUNDS;
D. CARBON REDUCTION PROGRAM FUNDS; AND
E. FUNDS FROM A FEDERAL PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AFTER JANUARY 1, 2024, WITH SPECIFIC RULES THAT
SIGNIFICANTLY RESTRICT THE TYPES OR LOCATIONS OF PROJECTS THAT MAY BE
FUNDED.
(b) The Department shall:
(1) [In accordance with federal transportation requirements, develop a
project–based scoring system for major transportation projects using the goals and
measures established under subsection (c) of this section;] DEVELOP, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE APPLICABLE METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS, A
PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM THAT:
(I) IS CONSISTENT WITH THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) IS DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL
TRANSPORTATION REQUIREMENTS; AND
(III) EVALUATES THE MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION
PROJECTS USING OBJECTIVE AND QUANTIFIABLE MEASURES FOR THE GOALS

HOUSE BILL 230
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION THAT CONSIDER THE
BENEFITS OF A PROJECT RELATIVE TO ITS COST TO THE STATE;
(2) Develop the weighting metrics for each goal and measure established
under subsection (c) of this section;
(3) [On or before January 1, 2018, develop a model consistent with this
section that uses the project–based scoring system developed under this subsection to rank
major transportation projects being considered for inclusion in the draft and final
Consolidated Transportation Program;] PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION TO REVIEW AND COMMENT ON THE
GOALS, MEASURES, AND METRICS DEVELOPED;
(4) [Use the model developed under this subsection to rank major
transportation projects being considered for inclusion in the draft and final Consolidated
Transportation Program; and] PUBLISH THE GUIDELINES DEVELOPED FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION;
(5) [Make the model developed under item (3) of this subsection and any
ranking under item (4) of this subsection available to the public:
(i) As an appendix to the Consolidated Transportation Program;
and
(ii) On the Department’s website] AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS, IN
COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION, REVIEW
AND UPDATE THE GUIDELINES, AS NECESSARY;
(6) IDENTIFY THE AMOUNT OF FUNDS AVAILABLE FOR EACH 2–YEAR
FUNDING CYCLE AFTER NEEDS ASSOCIATED WITH THE FOLLOWING HAVE BEEN
CONSIDERED:
(I) OPERATING, ADMINISTRATION, AND MAINTENANCE COSTS
OF THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) GRANTS TO OTHER ENTITIES, INCLUDING:
1. DISTRIBUTION OF HIGHWAY USER REVENUES TO
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. DISTRIBUTION OF LOCALLY OPERATED TRANSIT
SYSTEM GRANTS; AND

HOUSE BILL 230 13
3. DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS TO THE WASHINGTON
METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY;
(III) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS, INCLUDING SALARIES, WAGES,
AND FRINGE BENEFITS, RELATED TO OVERSIGHT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
DEPARTMENT’S CAPITAL PROGRAM;
(IV) CAPITAL FUNDING THAT INCLUDES:
1. FUNDS FOR CAPITAL PROJECTS OF THE MARYLAND
AVIATION ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND PORT ADMINISTRATION, THE MOTOR
VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, AND THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY;
2. FUNDS FOR HIGHWAY SYSTEM PRESERVATION AND
STATE OF GOOD REPAIR; AND
3. FUNDS FOR THE TRANSIT PROJECTS WHERE THE
PRIMARY PURPOSE IS STATE OF GOOD REPAIR; AND
(V) ALL OTHER CAPITAL NEEDS FOR PROJECTS NOT SUBJECT
TO THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM FOR MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS; AND
(7) (I) AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS AND SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE
FUNDING, SOLICIT REQUESTS FROM THE DEPARTMENT, LOCAL JURISDICTIONS,
AND APPROPRIATE METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS FOR MAJOR
SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS TO BE EVALUATED; AND
(II) REQUIRE EACH REQUESTER TO CERTIFY THAT ALL
MEMBERS OF THE LEGISLATIVE DELEGATION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT
REPRESENTS THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS LOCATED HAVE BEEN
NOTIFIED OF THE REQUEST.
(c) (1) The [State transportation goals are:] DEPARTMENT SHALL
EVALUATE MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS BASED ON POLICY GOALS.
(2) PROJECTS SHALL BE EVALUATED ON HOW THEY ADDRESS THE
FOLLOWING GOALS:
(i) Safety [and security];
(ii) [System preservation] ACCESSIBILITY AND MOBILITY;

HOUSE BILL 230
(iii) [Reducing congestion and improving commute times] CLIMATE
CHANGE AND THE ENVIRONMENT;
(iv) [Environmental stewardship] SOCIAL EQUITY;
(v) [Community vitality;] ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT; AND
(vi) [Economic prosperity;
(vii) Equitable access to transportation;
(viii) Cost effectiveness and return on investment; and
(ix) Local priorities] SUSTAINABLE LAND USE AND
TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT.
[(2) In evaluating whether and to what extent a major transportation
project satisfies the goals established under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Department shall assign a score for each goal using the weighting metrics developed by the
Department under subsection (b)(2) of this section and the following measures:
(i) For safety and security:
1. The expected reduction in total fatalities and severe
injuries in all modes affected by the project; and
2. The extent to which the project implements the Maryland
State Highway Administration’s Complete Streets policies.
(ii) For system preservation:
1. The degree to which the project increases the lifespan of
the affected facility;
2. The degree to which the project increases the functionality
of the facility; and
3. The degree to which the project renders the facility more
resilient.
(iii) For reducing congestion and improving commute times:
1. The expected change in cumulative job accessibility within
an approximately 60–minute commute for highway projects or transit projects;

HOUSE BILL 230 15
2. The degree to which the project has a positive impact on
travel time reliability and congestion; and
3. The degree to which the project supports connections
between different modes of transportation and promotes multiple transportation choices.
(iv) For environmental stewardship:
1. The potential of the project to limit or reduce harmful
emissions;
2. The degree to which the project avoids impacts on State
resources in the project area and adjacent areas; and
3. The degree to which the project advances the State
environmental goals.
(v) For community vitality:
1. The degree to which the project is projected to increase the
use of walking, biking, and transit;
2. The degree to which the project enhances existing
community assets; and
3. The degree to which the project furthers the affected
community’s and State’s plans for revitalization.
(vi) For economic prosperity:
1. The projected increase in the cumulative job accessibility
within an approximately 60–minute commute for projects;
2. The extent to which the project is projected to enhance
access to critical intermodal locations for the movement of goods and services; and
3. The projected increase in furthering nonspeculative local
and State economic development strategies in existing communities.
(vii) For equitable access to transportation:
1. The expected increase in job accessibility for
disadvantaged populations within an approximately 60–minute commute for projects; and
2. The projected economic development impact on
low–income communities.

HOUSE BILL 230
(viii) For cost effectiveness and return on investment:
1. The estimated travel time savings divided by the project
cost;
2. The degree to which the project leverages additional
federal, State, local, and private sector transportation investment; and
3. The degree to which the project will increase
transportation alternatives and redundancy.
(ix) For local priorities, the degree to which the project supports local
government transportation priorities, as specified in local government priority letters.]
(d) (1) The score of a major SURFACE transportation project shall be based
solely on the PROJECT’S CAPACITY TO SATISFY THE goals [and measures] established
under subsection (c) of this section RELATIVE TO THE PROJECT’S COST TO THE STATE.
(2) [The] BY THE TIME OF THE RELEASE OF THE DRAFT
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM IN EACH EVEN–NUMBERED FISCAL
YEAR, THE Department shall [make the scores of all projects evaluated for inclusion in the
Consolidated Transportation Program and assigned a score under the model available to
the public:
(i) As an appendix to the Consolidated Transportation Program;
and
(ii) On the Department’s website] PUBLISH IN THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM AND ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE THE SCORES OF ALL PROJECTS EVALUATED, THE RANKING OF ALL
PROJECTS EVALUATED, AND THE LIST OF PROJECTS RECOMMENDED TO RECEIVE
FUNDING WITHIN AVAILABLE FUNDS IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM.
(3) AFTER THE RELEASE OF THE DRAFT CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM, THE SECRETARY SHALL CONSIDER COMMENTS ON
EACH PROJECT’S EVALUATION IN DEVELOPING A FINAL RECOMMENDATION FOR
PROJECT FUNDING.
(4) (I) BEFORE THE RELEASE OF THE FINAL CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM IN EACH EVEN–NUMBERED FISCAL YEAR, THE
SECRETARY MAY MAKE ANY CHANGES TO THE RECOMMENDED PROJECT LIST THAT
THE SECRETARY DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE.

HOUSE BILL 230 17
(II) A MODIFICATION BY THE SECRETARY MAY BE
INCORPORATED INTO THE FINAL CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
ONLY AFTER THE SECRETARY HAS PRESENTED THE MODIFICATIONS TO THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION FOR THE COMMISSION’S REVIEW.
(E) (1) ON THE COMPLETION OF A ROUND OF PROJECT EVALUATIONS,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UNDERTAKE A REVIEW OF THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING
SYSTEM AND RELATED GUIDELINES TO DETERMINE WHETHER MODIFICATIONS TO
THE GUIDELINES ARE NECESSARY.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT MODIFICATIONS ARE
NECESSARY, THE RECOMMENDED MODIFICATIONS SHALL BE PRESENTED TO THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION FOR REVIEW.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECT MAY BE INCLUDED IN THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM FOR CONSTRUCTION ONLY IF IT HAS
BEEN EVALUATED BY THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING PROGRAM IN THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE REQUIREMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
DOES NOT APPLY TO A PROJECT IF, ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, THE PROJECT
HAS:
(I) PROGRESSED THROUGH 30% COMPLETION OF THE DESIGN
PHASE; OR
(II) BEEN SUBJECT TO AN AGREEMENT WITH A LOCAL
JURISDICTION FOR FINAL PROJECT DEVELOPMENT OR CONSTRUCTION.
[(e)] (G) Nothing in this section may be construed to impede or alter:
(1) The priority letter process that outlines local transportation priorities
for the Department’s consideration for inclusion in the Consolidated Transportation
Program under § 2–103.1 of this subtitle;
(2) The Department’s visit to each county under § 2–103.1(e) of this
subtitle; or
(3) The inclusion of local transportation priorities in the Consolidated
Transportation Program.
2–202.
There is a Maryland Transportation Commission in the Department.

HOUSE BILL 230
2–203.
(a) The Commission consists of the following [17] members:
(1) [As ex officio members, the seven regional members of the State Roads
Commission; and
(2) Ten members appointed by the Governor with the advice of the
Secretary] THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) EIGHT MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR, WITH AT LEAST
FOUR MEMBERS REPRESENTING URBANIZED AREAS AND AT LEAST TWO MEMBERS
REPRESENTING RURAL AREAS;
(3) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE; AND
(4) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE.
(b) An appointed member may not be [an]:
(1) AN officer or employee of the Department EXCEPT FOR THE
SECRETARY;
(2) A STATE ELECTED OFFICIAL; OR
(3) AN APPOINTED OFFICIAL OF THE STATE EXCEPT FOR THE
SECRETARY.
(C) Each appointed member shall be a resident of this State and have interest
and, preferably, experience in at least one of the fields under the jurisdiction of the
Department.
[(c)] (D) (1) Each appointed member serves for a term of [3] 4 years and until
his successor is appointed and qualifies. [The terms of appointed members shall be
staggered as required by the original appointments to the Commission, three of which were
made for a 3–year term, four of which were made for a 2–year term, and three of which
were made for a 1–year term.]
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON JULY 1, 2026.
(3) EACH APPOINTED MEMBER MAY BE REAPPOINTED AT THE
DISCRETION OF THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY.

HOUSE BILL 230 19
[(2)] (4) A member appointed to fill a vacancy in an unexpired term serves
only for the remainder of that term.
(E) THE SECRETARY MAY APPOINT A DESIGNEE WHO SERVES IN THE
SECRETARY’S CAPACITY WHEN THE SECRETARY IS NOT AVAILABLE.
2–204.
(a) The [Governor shall designate one of the appointed members of the
Commission as its Chairman] SECRETARY IS THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION.
(b) The Commission shall meet, at a time and place designated by the
Commission or its [Chairman] CHAIR:
(1) At least once each [month] QUARTER; and
(2) At any other time that the Secretary requests.
2–205.
(a) (1) The [Maryland Transportation] Commission shall study the entire
transportation system of this State and regularly discuss with the Secretary any matter
relating to this State’s transportation system.
(2) [Each of the seven regional members of the State Roads Commission,
who serve as ex officio members of the Maryland Transportation Commission, shall:
(i) Conduct a continuing survey of the secondary highways, as
defined in § 8–101 of this article, in that member’s region; and
(ii) Report on the highway needs and problems of that region to the
Maryland Transportation Commission.
(3)] The [Maryland Transportation] Commission may request of the
Secretary any information relating to the Department that is needed for the Commission’s
studies, surveys, and deliberations.
(b) The Commission shall [advise] HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND
DUTIES:
(1) ADVISE and make recommendations to the Secretary and the heads of
the units in the Department on all matters that concern transportation policy formation
and program execution;

HOUSE BILL 230
(2) REVIEW, ADVISE, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
SECRETARY ON THE DEPARTMENT’S QUARTERLY OPERATING AND CAPITAL
BUDGET UPDATES;
(3) REVIEW, ADVISE, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING
THE GUIDELINES TO IMPLEMENT THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM UNDER §
2–103.7 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(4) REVIEW, ADVISE, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING
THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the members of
the Maryland Transportation Commission appointed in accordance with this Act shall
expire as follows:
(1) of the members appointed by the Governor:
(i) two members in 2027;
(ii) two members in 2028;
(iii) two members in 2029; and
(iv) two members in 2030;
(2) of the members appointed by the Speaker of the House:
(i) one member in 2028; and
(ii) one member in 2029; and
(3) of the members appointed by the President of the Senate:
(i) one member in 2027; and
(ii) one member in 2028.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.